Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-398
Violations; penalty.

Any foreign or domestic motor carrier, private carrier, leasing company, broker, or freight forwarder operating any motor vehicle in violation of sections 75-392 to 75-3,100, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to such sections, or any order of the division issued pursuant to such sections is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and shall also be subject to section 75-369.03. Each day of the violation constitutes a separate offense.

Laws 2007, LB358, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 23;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 85.